Hawaii, session 2025, SB1123.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the safety and wellbeing of all road users, including pedestrians and cyclists, are of paramount importance, and ensuring a safe transportation environment is a core responsibility of the State. The legislature further finds that data consistently demonstrates that vehicle characteristics such as height, weight, and design significantly impact the severity and likelihood of injuries in vehicle-pedestrian collisions, necessitating a comprehensive review and establishment of safety standards to address these factors. The legislature further finds that the state highway modernization and safety council is well positioned to lead this effort, leveraging its expertise and collaboration with local and federal authorities to develop actionable recommendations for vehicle safety standards tailored to Hawaii's needs. The legislature also finds that it is in the public interest to identify and classify vehicles that pose a greater risk to pedestrians, establish methods to mitigate these risks, and ensure that these recommendations inform policies at federal, state, and county levels, and educate and inform the public. Accordingly, this purpose of this Act is to require the state highway modernization and safety council to: (1)  Conduct a thorough evaluation of vehicle characteristics; (2)  Develop a set of standards to identify high-risk vehicles; and (3)  Submit a report including these standards and any actionable recommendations to the legislature, no later than December 1, 2026. SECTION 2. The state highway safety and modernization council shall: (1)  Conduct a thorough evaluation of vehicle characteristics including but not limited to: (A)  Hood design; (B)  Bumper design; (C)  Windshield design; (D)  Vehicle height; and (E)  Vehicle weight. (2)  Develop a set of standards to identify high-risk vehicles; and (3)  Submit the developed set of standards and a report of its findings and recommendations, including any proposed legislation, to the legislature no later than December 1, 2026. SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________